Hawaii statutes.
§171-49 Residence lots: unsold; forfeited;
surrendered. Any lot not sold or leased at public auction or drawing, or
sold or leased and forfeited, or surrendered after sale or lease with the
consent of the board of land and natural resources, which consent is
authorized, may, subject to section 171-21, be disposed of by the board as
follows:

(1) The board shall hold the lot without disposition
for a period of thirty days, during which time, any person otherwise qualified
to bid interested in securing the lot may apply therefor in writing.

(2) Upon the expiration of thirty days, if not more
than one person has applied for the lot, the board may dispose of the lot to
the sole applicant without public auction at not less than the prior upset
price; provided that if the lot is one among several available lots and there
are more applicants than available lots, this paragraph shall not apply.

(3) If more than one person has applied for the lot,
or if there are more applicants than available lots, upon the expiration of
thirty days, the board shall by sale or lease dispose of the lot or all of the
available lots, as the case may be, at drawing as provided in section 171-15 or
at public auction as provided in sections 171-14 and 171-16, at the prior upset
price or, if the drawing or public auction is held more than six months after
the date of the prior drawing or public auction, at the upset price fixed by a
reappraisal. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-46; HRS §171-49; am L 1970, c
184, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next